Wyoming, session 2025, HB0073.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-1-122(a)(iii) and 34-19-101(a)(iii)
are amended to read:
1-1-122. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(iii) "Sport or recreational opportunity" means
commonly understood sporting activities including baseball,
softball, football, soccer, basketball, swimming, hockey,
wrestling, cheerleading, rodeo, dude ranching, nordic or
alpine skiing and other alpine sports, snowboarding,
mountain climbing, rock climbing, outdoor education
programs, river floating, hunting, fishing, backcountry
trips, horseback riding and any other equine activity,
snowmobiling and similar recreational opportunities and
includes the use of private lands for vehicle parking and
land access related to the sport or recreational
opportunity. "Sport or recreational opportunity" does not
include skiing in a ski area as defined by the Ski Safety
Act;
34-19-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0073
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iii) "Recreational purpose" includes, but is
not limited to, any one (1) or more of the following:
hunting, fishing, swimming, boating, camping, picnicking,
hiking, pleasure driving, nature study, water skiing,
winter sports, bicycling, mountain biking, horseback riding
and other equine activities as defined in W.S.
1-1-122(a)(iv), rock climbing, noncommercial aviation
activities and viewing or enjoying historical,
archaeological, scenic or scientific sites;
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2